California statutes. Education Code
 colleges, participating nonprofit entities, or university applicants shall be deposited, and shall be kept separate and apart from and not commingled with any other moneys of the authority. Moneys deposited in that account shall be paid out on checks signed by the chairperson of the authority or by a person or persons authorized by the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 28.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

94194.

(a) Whenever the authority under Section 94190 undertakes to construct, acquire, or otherwise provide a project and to lease the same to a private college or university applicant the lessee shall be responsible for the direct operation and maintenance costs of such project and, in addition, shall be responsible for the overall supervision of each project, for the overhead and general
 administrative costs of the lessee which are incurred because of such project and for the integration of each project operation into the lessee’s educational program.

(b) Whenever the authority under Section 94191 makes loans for the construction of a project, the private college or university applicant at which such project is located shall be responsible for the direct operation and maintenance costs of such project and, in addition, shall be responsible for the overall supervision of each project, for the overhead and general administrative costs of the private college or university applicant which are incurred because of such project and for the integration of each project operation into the institution’s educational
 program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 29.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

94195.

Any pledge of moneys, earnings, income, or revenues authorized with respect to participating private colleges, participating nonprofit entities, or university applicants, pursuant to this chapter, shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made. The moneys, earnings, income, or revenues so pledged and thereafter received by the pledgor shall immediately be subject to the lien of that pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act. The lien of that pledge shall be valid
 and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the pledgor irrespective of whether the parties have notice thereof. No instrument by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded in any manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 30.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Construction [94210. - 94213.]

94210.

This chapter, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

94211.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed or construed to create or constitute a debt, liability, or a loan or pledge of the credit of the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

94212.

(a) This chapter shall be deemed to provide a complete, additional, and alternative method for doing the things authorized by this chapter, and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws. The issuance of bonds and refunding bonds under this chapter need not comply with any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds including, but not limited to, Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a), a project that is financed in accordance with this chapter shall not be exempt from any provision of law that is otherwise applicable to the project, and the applicant shall provide documentation, before the authority approves the issuance of bonds for the project, that the project has complied with Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code, or is not a project under that division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 714, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

94213.

The powers granted to the authority by this chapter may be exercised without regard or reference to any department or agency of the state. All other general or special laws, or parts thereof, inconsistent with this chapter are hereby declared to be inapplicable to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.2. Accommodation of Religious Creed [94355. - 94355.]

94355.

(a) As a condition of doing business in this state, each postsecondary educational institution governed by Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 94700), and each organization that administers educational testing for use in the admissions process by any public or private postsecondary educational institution, shall, in administering any test or examination, permit any student who is eligible to undergo the test or examination to do so, without penalty, at a time when that activity would not violate the student’s religious creed.

(b) This requirement shall not apply in the event that administering the test or examination at an alternate time would impose an undue hardship which could not reasonably have been avoided. In any court proceeding in which the existence of an undue hardship that could not reasonably have been avoided is an issue, the burden of proof shall be upon the institution.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1997.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 283) and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 283.5.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Section operative January 1, 1997, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.3. Speech and Other Communication [94367. - 94367.]

94367.

(a) No private postsecondary educational institution shall make or enforce a rule subjecting a student to disciplinary sanctions solely on the basis of conduct that is speech or other communication that, when engaged in outside the campus or facility of a private postsecondary institution, is protected from governmental restriction by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution or Section 2 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(b) A student enrolled in a private postsecondary institution at the time that the institution has made or enforced any rule in violation of subdivision (a) may commence a civil action to obtain appropriate injunctive and declaratory relief as determined by the court. Upon motion, a court may award attorney’s fees to a prevailing plaintiff in a civil action pursuant to this section.

(c) This section does not apply to a private postsecondary educational institution that is controlled by a religious organization, to the extent that the application of this section would not be consistent with the religious tenets of the organization.

(d) This section does not authorize the prior restraint of student speech.

(e) This section does not prohibit the imposition of discipline for harassment, threats, or intimidation, unless constitutionally protected.

(f) This section does not prohibit an institution from adopting rules and regulations that are designed to prevent hate violence, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 4 of Chapter 1363 of the Statutes of 1992, from being directed at students in a manner that denies them their full participation in the educational process, so long as the rules and regulations conform to standards established by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution and Section 2 of Article I of the California Constitution for citizens generally.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 525, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.7. Student Safety [94380. - 94385.]

94380.

Each private postsecondary educational institution with a full-time equivalency enrollment of over 1,000 and private vocational educational institution shall do all of the following:

(a) Require the appropriate officials at each campus of their respective institutions to compile records of all occurrences reported to police or campus authorities, and arrests for crimes involving violence, theft, or destruction of property, or illegal drugs or alcoholic intoxication that happen on the campus.

(b) Make the information compiled pursuant to subdivision (a) available on the request of any student or employee of, or applicant for admission to, any campus of their respective institutions.

(c) Require the appropriate officials at each campus of their respective institutions to prepare, prominently post, and copy for distribution on request a campus safety plan that sets forth all of the following: the availability and location of security personnel, methods for summoning assistance of security personnel, any special safeguards that have been established for particular facilities or activities, any actions taken in the preceding 18 months to increase safety, and any changes in safety precautions expected to be made during the next 24 months. For the purposes of this section, posting and distribution may be accomplished by including relevant safety information in a student handbook or brochure that is made generally available to students.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 53.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

94385.

(a) Each private postsecondary educational institution and private vocational educational institution shall each adopt, and implement at each of their respective campuses or other facilities, a written procedure or protocols to ensure, to the fullest extent possible, that students, faculty, and staff who are victims of sexual assault committed at or upon the grounds of, or upon off-campus grounds or facilities maintained by the institution, or upon grounds or facilities maintained by affiliated student organizations, shall receive treatment and information. If appropriate on-campus treatment facilities are unavailable, the written procedure or protocols may provide for referrals to local community treatment centers.

(b) The written procedures or protocols adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall contain at least the following information:

(1) The college policy regarding sexual assault on campus.

(2) Personnel on campus who should be notified, and procedures for notification, with the consent of the victim.

(3) Legal reporting requirements, and procedures for fulfilling them.

(4) Services available to victims, and personnel responsible for providing these services, such as the person assigned to transport the victim to the hospital, to refer the victim to a counseling center, and to notify the police, with the victim’s concurrence.

(5) A description of campus resources available to victims, as well as appropriate off-campus services.

(6) Procedures for ongoing case management, including procedures for keeping the victim informed of the status of any student disciplinary proceedings in connection with the sexual assault, and the results of any disciplinary action or appeal, and helping the victim deal with academic difficulties that may arise because of the victimization and its impact.

(7) Procedures for guaranteeing confidentiality and appropriately handling requests for information from the press, concerned students, and parents.

(8) Each victim of sexual assault should receive information about the existence of at least the following options: criminal prosecutions, civil prosecutions, the disciplinary process through the college, the availability of mediation, alternative housing assignments, and academic assistance alternatives.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “sexual assault” includes, but is not limited to, rape, forced sodomy, forced oral copulation, rape by a foreign object, sexual battery, or threat of sexual assault.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 55.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Consolidation of Private Colleges [94400. - 94409.]

94400.

Whenever any benevolent, religious, or fraternal organization or society, having a grand lodge, assembly, conference, or other legislative or representative head in the state, and having two or more colleges or institutions of higher education under its patronage, desires, for the purpose of greater efficiency and simplicity in the administration of its educational interests, to consolidate the institutions under one management, the organization or society may consolidate the institutions under one management, pursuant to this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

94401.

The grand lodge, assembly, conference, or other legislative or representative head having authorized a consolidation of its institutions, a new corporation shall be formed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

94402.

The board of trustees of the new corporation shall at first consist of the persons constituting the boards of trustees of the several institutions consolidating, and others. The number of trustees shall not exceed 45. The board of trustees shall be so classified that the term of office of one-third of its members expires each year, and unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, the successors of the trustees, as their terms expire shall be elected by the grand lodge, assembly, conference, or other legislative or representative head, at its annual meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

94403.

After the two or more colleges or institutions of higher education under the patronage of any benevolent, religious, or fraternal organization or society, having a grand lodge, assembly, conference, or other legislative or representative head in the state have become consolidated, the board of trustees of the new corporation may be reduced in number after it has transacted the business of the corporation for a period of five years after the consolidation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

94404.

Unless other provision is made in the articles of incorporation the number of trustees shall be reduced by the grand lodge, assembly, conference, or other legislative or representative head of the colleges or institutions of higher education. At any annual session of the grand lodge, assembly, conference, or other legislative or representative head, there shall be dropped from the number of trustees to be elected at that session such a number of trustees as those present at the session determine, except that at no time shall the number of trustees composing the board be less than 15.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

94405.

Provision may be made in the articles of incorporation, in addition to any other matters required by law, for the number of trustees, for the method of nominating and electing trustees, and special qualifications, if any, required of persons to be elected or of any particular number of such persons. If not made in the articles of incorporation, such methods and qualifications may be set forth in the bylaws.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

94406.

Bylaws may be adopted and amended by the trustees except as otherwise provided in the articles or the bylaws. The bylaws may set forth the particular officers or persons in the grand lodge, conference, assembly, or other legislative or representative head entitled to vote as members of the corporation, and also the manner and method by which the voting is had. The bylaws may limit or restrict the power of the trustees to adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws. After the limitation or restriction is made it shall be complied with unless it is removed with the consent of the officers or persons entitled to vote as members. Where applicable the provisions of Articles 5 and 6 (commencing with Sections 5150 and 5160) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code apply to the bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1305.)
-------------------------------------------

94407.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 94406, in the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws, the board of trustees of the new corporation have all of the powers granted to boards of directors by and enumerated in Article 1 (commencing with Section 5210) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1305.)
-------------------------------------------

94408.

The board of trustees of the new corporation shall report annually to the grand lodge, conference, assembly, or other legislative or representative head controlling it, the condition of affairs of the corporation, and the amount and manner of its receipts and expenditures.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

94409.

The several boards of trustees of the consolidating institutions shall transfer all property, real and personal, held by them, to the new corporation, together with all powers, privileges, and authority conferred upon or enjoyed by them under their respective charters or acts of incorporation. The new corporation receiving the property shall assume all indebtedness and liabilities of the consolidating institutions, but shall not transfer the property from one location to another, except by an affirmative vote of not less than three-fourths of the board of trustees of the new corporation, nor divert specific grants, donations, or bequests from the purposes for which the grants, donations, or bequests were made. After the boards of trustees have conveyed the property, real and personal, of the various institutions to the new corporation, and the property has been accepted by the new corporation, the franchises held by the consolidating corporations shall cease, and the corporations are dissolved.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Eminent Domain [94500. - 94500.]

94500.

Any educational institution of collegiate grade within this state not conducted for profit may acquire by eminent domain any property necessary to carry out any of its powers or functions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Emergency Evacuation Plans for Postsecondary Student Housing [94600. - 94600.]

94600.

(a) The Office of Emergency Services shall develop guidelines for private colleges and universities to use in developing emergency evacuation plans for all forms of student housing owned, operated, and offered by private colleges and universities, both on campus and off campus. In developing the guidelines, the Office of Emergency Services shall consider Sections 3.09 and 3.13 of Title 19 of the California Code of Regulations. The guidelines shall address all of the following issues:

(1) Plan content. The plans should include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(A) Specific evacuation routes that recognize the needs of
 persons with special needs, such as persons with disabilities.

(B) The designation of a meeting place or places upon evacuation.

(C) The education of students and staff in emergency procedures.

(2) The implementation and maintenance of the evacuation plan by the director of student housing, or other appropriate officer, at individual campuses. The director, or other appropriate officer, is responsible for scheduling periodic tests of the plan and implementing changes as needed.

(b) Each private college or university shall establish an emergency evacuation plan for its postsecondary student housing and may consult with the Office of Emergency Services for guidance
 in developing and establishing the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 77.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Private Postsecondary Institutions [94800. - 94950.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [94800. - 94801.7.]

94800.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Private Postsecondary Education Act of 2009.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94800.5.

Whenever a reference is made to the former Private Postsecondary Education and Student Protection Act, the former Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education Reform Act of 1989, or the former Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 94700) of Part 59 of Division 10 of Title 3 of the Education Code, as it read on June 30, 2007, by the provisions of any statute or regulation, it shall be construed as referring to the provisions of this chapter. Whenever a reference is made to the former Bureau for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education by the provisions of any statute or regulation, it shall be construed as referring to the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94801.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) In 2013, more than 300,000 Californians attended more than 1,100 private postsecondary schools in California.

(b) Private postsecondary schools can complement the public education system and help develop a trained workforce to meet the demands of California businesses and the economy; however, concerns about the value of degrees and diplomas issued by private postsecondary schools, and the lack of protections for private postsecondary school students and consumers of those schools’ services, have highlighted the need for strong state-level oversight of private postsecondary schools.

(c) Numerous reports and studies have concluded that California’s previous attempts at regulatory oversight of private postsecondary schools under the Department of Consumer Affairs have consistently failed to ensure student protections or provide effective oversight of private postsecondary schools.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature in continuing the operation of this chapter for two years until January 1, 2017, to ensure all of the following:

(1) Minimum educational quality standards and opportunities for success for California students attending private postsecondary schools in California.

(2) Meaningful student protections through essential avenues of recourse for students.

(3) A
 regulatory structure that provides for an appropriate level of oversight.

(4) A regulatory governance structure that ensures that all stakeholders have a voice and are heard in policymaking by the bureau.

(5) A regulatory governance structure that provides for accountability and oversight by the Legislature through program monitoring and periodic reports.

(6) Prevention of the harm to students and the deception of the public that results from fraudulent or substandard educational programs and degrees.

(e) The Legislature advises future policymakers to continually and carefully evaluate this chapter and its administration and enforcement. Where there are deficiencies in the law or regulatory oversight, the Governor and the Legislature should act quickly
 to correct them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 840, Sec. 1.   (SB 1247)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94801.5.

(a) An out-of-state private postsecondary educational institution shall register with the bureau, pay a fee pursuant to Section 94930.5, and comply with all of the following:

(1) The institution shall provide the bureau with all of the following information, as applicable, for consideration of initial registration by the bureau pursuant to paragraph (2).

(A) Evidence of institutional accreditation.

(B) Evidence that the institution is approved to operate in the state where the institution maintains its main administrative location.

(C) The agent for service of process consistent with Section 94943.5.

(D) A copy of the institution’s catalog and, if the institution uses enrollment agreements, a copy of a sample enrollment agreement.

(E) Whether or not the institution, or a predecessor institution under substantially the same control or ownership, had its authorization or approval revoked or suspended by a state or by the federal government, or, within five years before submission of the registration, was subject to an enforcement action by a state or by the federal government that resulted in the imposition of limits on enrollment or student aid, or is subject to such an action that is not final and that was ongoing at the time of submission of the
 registration.

(F) Whether or not the institution, or a controlling officer of, or a controlling interest or controlling investor in, the institution or in the parent entity of the institution, had been subject to any education, consumer protection, unfair business practice, fraud, or related enforcement action by a state or federal agency within five years before submitting the registration. If so, the institution shall provide the bureau a copy of the operative complaint with the registration.

(G) Whether or not the institution is currently on probation, show cause, or subject to other adverse action, or the equivalent thereof, by its accreditor or has had its accreditation revoked or suspended within the five years before submitting the registration.

(H) Whether or not the institution, within five years before
 submitting the registration, has settled, or been adjudged to have liability for, a civil complaint alleging the institution’s failure to provide educational services, including a complaint alleging a violation of Title IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972 (Public Law 92-318) or a similar state law, or a complaint alleging a violation of a law concerning consumer protection, unfair business practice, or fraud, filed by a student or former student, an employee or former employee, or a public official, for more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). The institution shall provide the bureau a copy of the complaint filed by the plaintiff and a copy of the judgment or settlement agreement for any such judgment or settlement, and the bureau shall consider, pursuant to paragraph (2), all material terms and aspects of the settlement, including, for example, whether a
 student plaintiff remained enrolled or reenrolled at the institution.

(I) Any additional documentation the bureau deems necessary for consideration in the registration process.

(2) When considering whether to approve, deny, or condition initial registration based upon the information provided by an institution pursuant to paragraph (1), the bureau shall do all of the following:

(A) Not consider any individual submission made under paragraph (1) to be solely determinative of the institution’s eligibility for registration but, exercising its reasonable discretion, approve, reject, or condition registration based upon a review of all of the information provided to it under paragraph (1).

(B) Provide an institution with reasonable notice and opportunity to comment before the bureau regarding any determination to deny, condition, or reject initial registration before that determination becomes final. After the determination becomes final, the institution may seek review of the bureau’s decision through an action brought pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(C) Require the initial registration, if approved, to memorialize that the institution agrees, as a condition of its registration, to be bound by this section and that its registration may be rejected, conditioned, or revoked for failure to comply with this section, as provided by subdivision (b). The agreement shall be signed by a responsible officer of the institution.

(3) An
 institution that is registered with the bureau and enrolls a student residing in California shall report in writing to the bureau, within 30 days, the occurrence of any of the following:

(A) The institution has its authorization or approval revoked or suspended by a state or by the federal government, or has been subject to an enforcement action by a state or by the federal government that resulted in the imposition of limits on enrollment or student aid.

(B) The institution or a controlling officer of, or a controlling interest or controlling investor in, the institution or in the parent entity of the institution is subject to any education, consumer protection, unfair business practice, fraud, or related enforcement action by a state or federal agency. If so, the institution
 shall provide the bureau a copy of the operative complaint.

(C) The institution is currently on probation, show cause, or subject to other adverse action, or the equivalent thereof, by its accreditor or the accreditation of the institution is revoked or suspended.

(D) The institution settles, or is adjudged to have liability for, a civil complaint alleging the institution’s failure to provide educational services, including a complaint alleging a violation of Title IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972 (Public Law 92-318) or a similar state law, or a complaint alleging a violation of a law concerning consumer protection, unfair business practice, or fraud, filed by a student or former student, an employee or former employee, or a public official, for more than two hundred fifty
 thousand dollars ($250,000). The institution shall provide to the bureau a copy of the complaint filed by the plaintiff and a copy of the judgment or settlement agreement for any such judgment or settlement, and the bureau shall consider, pursuant to subdivision (b), all material terms and aspects of the settlement, including, for example, whether a student plaintiff remained enrolled or reenrolled at the institution.

(4) The requirements of the Student Tuition Recovery Fund, established in Article 14 (commencing with Section 94923), and regulations adopted by the bureau related to the fund, for its students residing in California.

(5) The institution shall provide disclosures pursuant to the requirements for the Student Tuition Recovery Fund, established in Article 14
 (commencing with Section 94923), and regulations adopted by the bureau related to the fund, for its students residing in California.

(b) (1) Upon receipt of any of the notifications in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the bureau shall, within 30 days of receiving the notice, request the institution to explain in writing why the institution should be permitted to continue to enroll California residents. If the bureau, after reviewing the information submitted in response to the request and after consultation with the Attorney General, issues a written finding that there is no immediate risk to California residents from the institution continuing to enroll new students, the institution shall be permitted, pending completion of a review by the bureau, to continue to enroll new students or the bureau may, in its
 discretion, limit enrollments.

(2) Any institution under review pursuant to paragraph (1) may have its registration revoked by the bureau if, after further review, the bureau issues a written finding that there is a substantial risk posed to California residents by the institution continuing to enroll California residents.

(3) An institution shall have the right to reasonable notice and opportunity to comment to and before the bureau regarding any determination to revoke registration or to limit enrollment before that determination becomes final. An institution may seek review of a bureau order limiting new student enrollment or revoking registration under this subdivision through an action brought pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(4) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as preventing the bureau from revoking an institution’s registration on any other grounds specified in this chapter. Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting or impairing the ability of an institution registered pursuant to this section or eligible to register pursuant to this section from applying to be an approved institution pursuant to this chapter.

(c) (1) This section does not apply to a higher education institution that grants undergraduate degrees, graduate degrees, or both, and that is either formed as a nonprofit corporation and is accredited by an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, or is a public institution of higher education.

(2) This section does not apply to a higher education institution that does not award degrees and that solely provides educational programs for total charges of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less when no part of the total charges is paid from state or federal student financial aid programs. The bureau may adjust this charge threshold based upon the California Consumer Price Index and post notification of the adjusted charge threshold on its internet website as the bureau determines, through the promulgation of regulations, that the adjustment is consistent with the intent of this chapter.

(d) An institution described in subdivision (a) that fails to comply with this section is not authorized to operate in this state. Any institution whose registration is denied or
 revoked is authorized to reapply for registration after 12 months have elapsed from the date of the denial or revocation of registration.

(e) A registration with the bureau pursuant to this section shall be valid for five years.

(f) The bureau shall develop through emergency regulations effective on and after July 1, 2021, a registration form. The adoption of these regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code. These emergency regulations shall become law through the regular rulemaking process by January 1, 2022.

(g) The bureau shall disclose on
 its internet website a list of institutions registered pursuant to this section through reasonable means and disclose a designated email address for California residents to send a complaint to the bureau about an institution registered pursuant to this section. Complaints received through this email address shall be investigated in the same manner as complaints received by the bureau for institutions approved to operate pursuant to this chapter, but bureau enforcement in response to such complaints against institutions registered pursuant to this section shall be governed by subdivision (b).

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2022.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 153, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 544, Sec. 1.   (SB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94801.7.

(a) The bureau may establish through regulation thresholds of California-based activity that constitute limited physical presence, with those institutions subject to registration requirements defined through regulation, and minimal levels of California-based activity that do not require institutional approval by, nor registration with, the bureau. All institutions operating in the state and subject to approval or registration requirements shall comply with Section 94897.

(b) An institution is considered to have a physical presence in the state if it offers instruction or core academic support services from a physical location owned, operated, or rented by or on behalf
 of the institution in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 544, Sec. 2.   (SB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Transition Provisions [94802. - 94809.6.]

94802.

An institution that had a valid approval to operate on June 30, 2007, issued by the former Bureau for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education pursuant to former Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 94700) of Part 59 of Division 10 of Title 3 of the Education Code, as it read on June 30, 2007, shall maintain that approval under this chapter. For the purposes of this chapter, the approval to operate shall be valid for three calendar years after the expiration date of the approval, as it read on June 30, 2007.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 840, Sec. 2.   (SB 1247)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94803.

The bureau shall, by emergency regulation, amend, and repeal as necessary, the regulations, as they read on June 30, 2007, in Division 7.5 (commencing with Section 70000) of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, to conform to this chapter no later than February 1, 2010. These emergency regulations shall become permanent through the regular rulemaking process within one year of the enactment of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94804.

(a) Each unresolved matter submitted to the former Bureau for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education prior to July 1, 2007, shall be deemed to remain pending before the bureau irrespective of any applicable deadlines. With respect to any deadline applicable to a pending matter, no time shall be deemed to have elapsed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2010, inclusive.

(1) For the purposes of this subdivision, “matter” includes, but is not limited to, an appeal, a complaint, a claim, an evaluation, a hearing, or an investigation.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, “matter” does
 not include a Student Tuition Recovery Fund claim.

(b) Student complaints submitted from July 1, 2007, to December 31, 2009, inclusive, shall continue to be duly recorded and investigated by the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94805.

For the performance of the duties and exercise of the powers vested in the bureau, the bureau shall have possession and control of all records, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, or other property, real or personal, held for the benefit or use by the former Bureau for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94806.

The Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education Administration Fund established by former Section 94932 of the Education Code, and extended by Chapter 635 of the Statutes of 2007, is continued in existence, and is renamed the Private Postsecondary Education Administration Fund.
